Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 55 Educational Benefits for Persons over Sixty

16-55-1.
Educational benefits for persons over sixty.

Any person who is a permanent resident of this state and who submits proof sufficient to establish his age of sixty (60) years or older and whose household income is less than three (3) times the federal poverty level as established by the U.S. department of health and human services shall be entitled to take courses at any public institution of higher education in the state without the payment of tuition, exclusive of other fees and charges; provided, that any person eligible for financial aid, as determined by the institution of higher education, shall apply for the financial aid. Any financial aid award received by the applicant shall be applied toward the full amount of tuition that would have been charged by the public institution of higher education. Admission into particular courses will be granted upon a space available basis and shall be at the discretion of the particular institutions to which application is made.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 320, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 67; § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 52, § 1.